Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.122.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Aerospace training or educational program" means a course in the aerospace industry offered by the Washington aerospace training and research center, the Spokane aerospace technology center, Renton technical college, or Everett Community College.

(2) "Eligible student" means a student who is registered for an aerospace training or educational program, is making satisfactory progress as defined by the program, and has a declared intention to work in the aerospace industry in the state of Washington.

(3) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

(4) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received an aerospace training student loan.

(5) "Student loan" means a loan that is approved by the office and awarded to an eligible student.

[ 2015 c 218 s 1; 2012 c 50 s 4; 2011 c 8 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 50 ss 4-8: "Sections 4 through 8 of this act take effect July 1, 2012." [ 2012 c 50 s 9.]

Finding—Intent—2012 c 50: See note following RCW 28B.50.903.